Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 4
DIESEL INSPECTION PROGRAM

42-4-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Certification of emissions control" means one of the following certifications, issued to the owner of a diesel vehicle which is subject to the diesel inspection program in order to indicate the status of inspection requirement compliance of such vehicle:

"Certification of diesel smoke opacity compliance" is a document which indicates that the smoke emissions from the vehicle comply with applicable smoke opacity limits at the time of inspection or after required adjustments or repairs;

"Certification of diesel smoke opacity waiver" is a document which indicates that the smoke emissions from the vehicle does not comply with the applicable smoke opacity limits after inspection, adjustment, and emissions related repairs.

"Commission" means the air quality control commission.

"Diesel emissions inspection station" means a facility which meets the requirements established by the commission, is licensed by the executive director, and is so equipped as to enable a diesel vehicle emissions-opacity inspection to be performed.

"Diesel emissions inspector" means a person possessing a valid license to perform diesel emissions-opacity inspections in compliance with the requirements of the commission.

"Diesel powered motor vehicle" or "diesel vehicle" as applicable to opacity inspections, includes only a motor vehicle with four wheels or more on the ground, powered by an internal combustion, compression ignition, diesel fueled engine, and also includes any motor vehicle having a personal property classification of A, B, or C, pursuant to section 42-3-106, as specified on its vehicle registration, and for which registration in this state is required for operation on the public roads and highways. "Diesel vehicle" does not include: Vehicles registered under section 42-12-301; vehicles taxed under section 42-3-306 (4); or off-the-road diesel powered vehicles or heavy construction equipment.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of revenue or the executive director's designee.

(6.3) "Heavy-duty diesel vehicle" means a vehicle that is greater than fourteen thousand pounds gross vehicle weight rating.

(6.7) "Light-duty diesel vehicle" means a vehicle that is less than or equal to fourteen thousand pounds gross vehicle weight rating.

"Opacity meter" means an optical instrument that is designed to measure the opacity of diesel exhaust gases.

"Program area" means the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, and Weld, and the cities and counties of Broomfield and Denver, excluding the following areas:

That portion of Adams county which is east of Kiowa creek (Range 62 West, Townships 1, 2, and 3 South) between the Adams-Arapahoe county line and the Adams-Weld county line;

That portion of Arapahoe county which is east of Kiowa creek (Range 62 West, Townships 4 and 5 South) between the Arapahoe-Elbert county line and the Arapahoe-Adams county line;

That portion of El Paso county which is east of the following boundary, defined on a south-to-north axis: From the El Paso-Pueblo county line north (upstream) along Chico creek (Ranges 63 and 64 West, Township 17 South) to Hanover road, then east along Hanover road (El Paso county route 422) to Peyton highway, then north along Peyton highway (El Paso county route 463) to Falcon highway, then west on Falcon highway (El Paso county route 405) to Peyton highway, then north on Peyton highway (El Paso county route 405) to Judge Orr road, then west on Judge Orr road (El Paso county route 108) to Elbert road, then north on Elbert road (El Paso county route 91) to the El Paso-Elbert county line;

That portion of Larimer county which is west of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Range 71 West and that portion which is north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Township 10 North;

That portion of Weld county which is outside the corporate boundaries of Greeley, Evans, La Salle, and Garden City and, in addition, is outside the following boundary: Beginning at the point of intersection of the west boundary line of section 21, township six north, range sixty-six west and state highway 392, east along state highway 392 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 37; then south along Weld county road 37 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 64; then east along Weld county road 64 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 43; then south along Weld county road 43 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 62; then east along Weld county road 62 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 49; then south along Weld county road 49 to the point of intersection with the south boundary line of section 13, township five north, range sixty-five west; then west along the south boundary line of section 13, township five north, range sixty-five west, section 14, township five north, range sixty-five west, and section 15, township five north, range sixty-five west; then, from the southwest corner of section 15, township five west, range sixty-five west, south along the east boundary line of section 21, township five north, range sixty-five west, and section 28, township five north, range sixty-five west; then west along the south boundary line of section 28, township five north, range sixty-five west; then south along the east boundary line of section 32, township five north, range sixty-five west, and section 5, township four north, range sixty-five west; then west along the south boundary line of section 5, township four north, range sixty-five west, section 6, township four north, range sixty-five west, and section 1, township four north, range sixty-six west; then north along the west boundary line of section 1, township four north, range sixty-six west, and section 36, township five north, range sixty-six west; then, from the point of intersection of the west boundary line of section 36, township five north, range sixty-six west and Weld county road 52, west along Weld county road 52 to the point of intersection with Weld county road 27; then north along Weld county road 27 to the point of intersection with the south boundary line of section 18, township five north, range sixty-six west; then west along the south boundary line of section 18, township five north, range sixty-six west, section 13, township five north, range sixty-seven west, and section 14, township five north, range sixty-seven west; then north along the west boundary line of section 14, township five north, range sixty-seven west, section 11, township five north, range sixty-seven west, and section 2, township five north, range sixty-seven west; then east along the north boundary line of section 2, township five north, range sixty-seven west, section 1, township five north, range sixty-seven west, section 6, township five north, range sixty-six west, and section 5, township five north, range sixty-six west; then, from the northeast corner of section 5, township five north, range sixty-six west, north along the west boundary line of section 33, township six north, range sixty-six west, section 28, township six north, range sixty-six west, and section 21, township six north, range sixty-six west, to the point of beginning.

"Smoke limit" means the maximum amount of allowable smoke opacity level as established by the commission.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2315, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(6.3) and (6.7) added and (7) amended, p. 1024, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(5) amended, p. 1175, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(8) amended, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1718, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2038, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(5) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 247, § 13, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-601 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-401 was relocated to § 42-4-501.

42-4-402. Administration of inspection program.

The department shall have responsibility for administering the diesel inspection program in accordance with the authority exercised by the executive director under the provisions of this part 4.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2316, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1643, § 28, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-601.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-402 was relocated to § 42-4-502.

42-4-403. Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall be responsible for the adoption of rules and regulations which are necessary to implement the diesel inspection program including:

Regulations governing procedures for:

Testing and licensing of diesel emissions inspectors;

Licensure of diesel emission inspection stations;

Standards and specifications for the approval, operation, calibration, and certification of exhaust smoke opacity meters;

Proper performance of diesel opacity inspections and emissions system control inspections;

Issuance of the following types of certifications of emissions control by licensed diesel emission inspectors:

A certification of diesel smoke opacity compliance if, at the time of inspection, the smoke opacity from a diesel vehicle is in compliance with the applicable smoke opacity limits;

A certification of diesel smoke opacity waiver if, at the time of inspection, the smoke opacity from a diesel vehicle does not comply with the applicable smoke opacity limits but such vehicle is adjusted or repaired to specifications as provided by regulation of the commission;

A temporary certification of diesel smoke opacity compliance for diesel vehicles required to be repaired, if such repairs are delayed due to the unavailability of needed parts. The results of the initial smoke opacity test and final test shall be given to the owner of the diesel vehicle and reported to the department of public health and environment.

The commission shall promulgate and from time to time revise regulations on inspection procedures and smoke opacity limits when such procedures and limits have been proven cost-effective and air pollution control-effective on the basis of best available scientific research.

Smoke limits shall not require unreasonable levels of emissions performance for a properly operated and maintained diesel vehicle of a given model year and technology, and such smoke limits shall be no less than twenty percent for five seconds minimum.

The commission may also develop peak smoke opacity limits, but such limits shall not be less than forty percent for less than one second.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection (2), for inspections conducted between January 1, 1990, and December 31, 1990, the smoke opacity limits shall be forty percent for five seconds minimum, and no diesel vehicle shall fail the smoke opacity inspection for peak limits.

The commission shall annually evaluate the diesel inspection program to determine but not limit the number of diesel vehicles which fail to meet the applicable smoke opacity limits after adjustments and repairs.

If the commission finds that a significant number of diesel vehicles do not meet the applicable smoke opacity limits after adjustments or repairs are made, the commission shall develop recommendations designed to improve the air pollution control-effectiveness of the diesel inspection program in a cost-effective manner and shall submit such recommendations to the general assembly.

In addition to any other authority granted under this section, the commission shall adopt regulations requiring each licensed diesel emissions inspection station to post, at the station, in a clearly legible manner and in a conspicuous place, the fee which shall be charged for performing a diesel emission-opacity inspection.

The commission may exempt diesel vehicles of any make, model, or model year from the provisions of the diesel inspection program when inspection would be inappropriate for such vehicles. The exemption may include diesel vehicles which are required to be registered and inspected January, 1990.

Notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary, the commission shall not have authority to adopt emission standards or implement an inspection and maintenance program that would result in emission requirements or an in-use testing or compliance demonstration that would be more stringent than the emission standards and test procedures adopted by the United States environmental protection agency for the corresponding model year and class of vehicle or engine.

The commission shall determine by accepted scientific analysis that any emission standards and in-use test procedures it may adopt shall be designed so that any engine or vehicle which would pass the appropriate federal certification test shall also pass the inspection and maintenance test adopted by the commission for that engine or vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2316, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1025, § 4, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-602 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-403 was relocated to § 42-4-503.

42-4-404. Powers and duties of the executive director of the department of public health and environment.

The executive director of the department of public health and environment, referred to in this section as the "executive director", shall develop a program for the training, testing, and retesting of diesel emissions inspectors, which program may be funded by tuition charged to the participants.

Those persons who successfully complete the testing set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be recommended to the department of revenue for licensure.

The executive director shall instruct the department of revenue to issue a license as a diesel inspection station to one or more parties with either new or existing diesel emissions inspection facilities. Such instruction shall be based on, among other factors:

Any requirements for licensure set by the commission by rule and regulation pursuant to section 42-4-403;

The requirements set forth in section 42-4-407;

The geographical coverage which would result for licensing the station.

Repealed.

The executive director shall continuously evaluate the diesel emissions inspection program. Such evaluation shall be based on continuing research conducted by the department of public health and environment and other engineering data and shall include assessments of the cost-effectiveness and air pollution control effectiveness of the program.

The executive director shall submit such evaluation and any recommendations for program changes to the general assembly by December 1 of each year, in order that the general assembly may annually review the diesel emissions inspection program.

The executive director shall implement an ongoing project designed to inform the public concerning the operation of the diesel emissions inspection program and the benefits to be derived from such program. The executive director shall also prepare a handbook which shall explain the diesel emissions inspection program, the owner's or operator's responsibilities under the program, the licensure of stations and inspectors, and any other aspects of the program which the executive director determines would be beneficial to the public. In addition to the distribution of such handbook, the executive director shall actively seek the assistance of the electronic and print media in communicating information to the public on the operation of the inspection program and shall utilize any other means of disseminating such information which may be likely to effectuate the purpose of such program.

The executive director may establish and operate technical or administrative centers, if necessary, for the proper administration of the diesel inspection program or may utilize existing centers established for the AIR program pursuant to section 42-4-307.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2317, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 1015, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(2)(d)(II) added by revision, pp. 1764, 1765, §§ 2, 3.

L. 2003:

(6) repealed, p. 1026, § 6, effective August 6.

42-4-405. Powers and duties of executive director.

The executive director is authorized to issue, deny, cancel, suspend, or revoke licensure for, and shall furnish instructions and all necessary forms to, diesel emissions inspection stations and inspectors. Fees for such licenses shall be established by regulations promulgated by the executive director.

The executive director shall supervise the activities of licensed diesel emissions inspection stations and inspectors and shall cause inspections to be made of such stations and records and such inspectors for compliance with licensure requirements. The accuracy of a licensed station's smoke opacity meters shall be inspected not less than once every sixty days.

The executive director shall require the surrender of any license which has been issued upon the cancellation, suspension, or revocation of the license for a violation of any of the provisions or of any of the regulations of the diesel emissions inspection program established pursuant to this part 4.

The executive director shall adopt regulations for the administration and operation of diesel emissions inspection stations and for the issuance, identification, and use of certifications of emissions control and shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to improve the effectiveness of the diesel emissions inspection program.

On and after January 1, 1991, the executive director shall hold hearings annually concerning the maximum inspection fee in order to ascertain whether such fee provides fair compensation for performing diesel emission-opacity inspections and represents an equitable charge to the consumer for such inspection.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2319, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(5)(b) repealed, p. 871, § 8, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-603 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-405 was relocated to § 42-4-506.

42-4-406. Requirement of certification of emissions control for registration - testing for diesel smoke opacity compliance.

A diesel vehicle in the program area that is registered or required to be registered pursuant to article 3 of this title, routinely operates in the program area, or is principally operated from a terminal, maintenance facility, branch, or division located within the program area shall not be sold, registered for the first time, or reregistered unless such vehicle has been issued a certification of emissions control within:

The past twelve months if the motor vehicle is a heavy-duty diesel vehicle that is over ten model years old;

The last twenty-four months if the motor vehicle is a heavy-duty diesel vehicle that is ten model years old or newer;

The last twelve months if the motor vehicle is a light-duty diesel vehicle that is at least ten model years old or that is model year 2003 or older; or

The last twenty-four months if the motor vehicle is a light-duty diesel vehicle that is ten model years old or newer and that is model year 2004 or newer.

A certification of emissions control shall be issued to any diesel vehicle that has been inspected and tested pursuant to subsection (2) of this section for diesel smoke opacity compliance and was found at such time to be within the smoke opacity limits established by the commission.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), new diesel vehicles, required under this section to have a certification of emissions control, shall be issued a certification of emissions compliance without inspection or testing. Prior to the expiration of the certification, the owner shall have the vehicle inspected and shall obtain a certification of emissions control for diesel smoke opacity compliance. The certificate shall expire on the earliest to occur of the following:

The anniversary of the day of the issuance of the certification when the vehicle has reached its fourth model year if it is a light-duty diesel vehicle;

The anniversary of the day of the issuance of the certification when the vehicle has reached its fourth model year if it is a heavy-duty diesel vehicle;

The anniversary of the day of the issuance of the certification when the vehicle has reached its sixth model year if the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or more and it is of a model year of 2014 or newer; or

On the date of the transfer of ownership if the date is within twelve months before the certification would expire under sub-subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this subparagraph (II), unless the transfer of ownership is a transfer from the lessor to the lessee.

On or after January 1, 1990, all heavy duty diesel vehicles in the program area not subject to the provisions of section 42-4-414, with fleets of nine or more, shall be required to be tested for diesel smoke opacity compliance at a licensed diesel inspection station by submitting to loaded mode opacity testing utilizing dynamometers or on-road tests as prescribed by the commission.

Light-duty diesel vehicles in the program area shall be required to be tested for diesel smoke opacity compliance at a licensed diesel inspection station by submitting to loaded mode opacity testing utilizing dynamometers.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2319, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a) amended, p. 954, § 11, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(1)(b)(II) amended, p. 120, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(II), and (2)(b) amended, p. 1024, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 252, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(II)(A) amended, p. 915, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2015:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 15-1134), ch. 172, p. 541, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-604 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-406 was relocated to § 42-4-507.

42-4-407. Requirements for a diesel emission-opacity inspection - licensure as diesel emissions inspection station - licensure as emissions inspector.

Unless a diesel emissions inspector performs an inspection at a licensed diesel inspection station or self-certification fleet station, as described in section 42-4-414, a diesel emission-opacity inspection shall not be performed and a certification of diesel emissions control shall not be issued; except that a certification of diesel emissions control may be issued for a heavy-duty fleet vehicle maintained in compliance with any rules the commission promulgates under section 42-4-414 (2)(b.5).

No station shall be licensed as a diesel emissions inspection station unless the executive director finds that:

The facilities of the station are of adequate size and the station is properly equipped. Such equipment shall include:

A smoke opacity meter which may be owned or leased and which has been approved as being in good working order by the executive director and has been registered with the department of public health and environment;

Any other equipment or testing devices which are required by rule or regulation of the commission;

The owner or operator of the station has one or more licensed diesel emission inspectors employed or under contract and such inspectors are responsible for all diesel emission-opacity inspections and the issuance of all certifications of emissions control;

Inspection procedures shall be properly conducted and shall include a smoke opacity inspection. For model years 1991 and newer, inspection procedures shall include evaluation of applicable emissions control systems.

Applications for licensure as a diesel inspection station shall be made on forms prescribed by the executive director.

No person shall be licensed as a diesel emissions inspector unless the person has demonstrated necessary skills and competence in the performance of diesel inspection by passing a qualification test developed and administered by the executive director of the department of public health and environment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2320, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1709, § 139, effective August 7; (1) amended, (HB 13-1091), ch. 94, p. 301, § 2, effective January 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-605 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-407 was relocated to § 42-4-508.

42-4-408. Operation of diesel inspection station.

A licensed diesel inspection station shall issue a certification of diesel emissions control to a diesel vehicle only upon forms issued by the executive director.

A certification of diesel emissions control shall be issued by a licensed diesel inspection station to a diesel vehicle only after the licensed diesel emission inspector performing the inspection determines that:

The smoke opacity levels from the diesel vehicle comply with the applicable smoke opacity limits, in which case a certification of diesel emission compliance shall be issued;

The smoke opacity levels from the diesel vehicle do not comply with the applicable smoke opacity limits after adjustment or repair required in accordance to commission rules have been performed, in which case a certification of diesel smoke opacity waiver shall be issued.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, no certification of diesel emissions control may be issued to a diesel vehicle of model year 1991 and newer if there is evidence of diesel emissions control system tampering.

A licensed diesel emissions inspection station shall charge a fee as set by the commission for the inspection of any diesel vehicle pursuant to this section. Such fee shall be intended to encompass all costs related to the inspection, including those costs incurred by the inspection station, the department of revenue, and the department of public health and environment. No fee that is charged pursuant to this section shall exceed the posted hourly shop rate for one hour. Such fee shall be posted by the inspection station pursuant to regulations set by the commission. Personnel within the testing inspection station shall notify the owner of the diesel vehicle to be tested of the fee before commencing any testing activities.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2321, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1764, § 1, effective February 1, 2001.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-606 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-408 was relocated to § 42-4-509.

42-4-409. Improper representation of a diesel inspection station.

The executive director shall have the authority to suspend or revoke the diesel inspection license and unused certification of diesel emissions control forms held by a licensed inspection station for the following reasons:

The station is not equipped as required;

The station is not operating from a location for which licensure was granted;

The licensed location has been altered so that it no longer qualifies as a diesel inspection station;

Diesel inspections are not being performed with applicable laws, rules, or regulations of the commission or the executive director.

The executive director shall also have authority to suspend or revoke the license of a diesel emissions inspector and require surrender of such license when the executive director determines that the inspector is not qualified to perform the diesel inspection or when inspections do not comply with applicable laws and the rules and regulations of the executive director or commission.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2321, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-607 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-409 was relocated to § 42-4-510.

42-4-410. Inclusion in the diesel inspection program.

Any home rule city, town, or county shall be included in the diesel inspection program set forth in this part 4 upon request by the governing body of such local government to the department of revenue and the department of public health and environment.

When such a request is made, the departments and governing body shall agree to a start-up date for the diesel inspection program in such areas. Such a date shall be administratively practical and agreed to by the departments.

On or after the dates agreed to pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), diesel vehicles which are registered in the area shall be inspected and shall be required to comply with the provisions of this part 4 and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto as if such area was included in the program area.

The executive directors of the departments of revenue and health and the commission shall perform all functions and exercise all phases related to the diesel emissions inspection program that they are otherwise required to perform under this part 4 in areas included in the program pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2322, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-608 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-410 was relocated to § 42-4-106.

42-4-411. Applicability of this part to heavy-duty diesel fleets of nine or more.

Diesel-powered motor vehicles subject to the provisions of section 42-4-414 shall not be subject to the diesel emissions inspection program set forth in this part 4 unless the conditions set forth in section 42-4-414 (3)(c) have been met.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2322, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 25-7-609 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-411 was relocated to § 42-4-512.

42-4-412. Air pollution violations.

A person commits a class 2 petty offense, as specified in section 18-1.3-503, C.R.S., if the person causes or permits the emission into the atmosphere from:

Any motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, powered by gasoline or any fuel except diesel of any visible air pollutant as defined in section 25-7-103 (1.5), C.R.S.;

Any diesel-powered motor vehicle, of any visible air pollutant, as defined in section 25-7-103 (1.5), C.R.S., which creates an unreasonable nuisance or danger to the public health, safety, or welfare.

Violations of this section may be determined by visual observations, including the snap acceleration opacity test, or by test procedures using opacity measurements.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall not apply to emissions caused by cold engine start-up.

The air quality control commission shall determine the minimum emission level of visible air pollutants from diesels which shall be considered to create an unreasonable nuisance or danger to the public health, safety, and welfare. Such minimum emission level shall be based on smoke levels attainable by correctly operated and maintained in-use diesel vehicles, considering altitude and other reasonable factors affecting visible smoke levels. In no case shall such level be less than twenty percent opacity when observed for five seconds or more. On interstate highways, opacity may be observed for ten seconds. Standards for transient conditions with no time limit shall also be established. Not later than December 1, 1979, the division shall develop a training course and qualification test designed to enable peace officers and environmental officers to ascertain violations of such standards without reference to opacity levels and to distinguish between air pollutants as defined in section 25-7-103 (1.5), C.R.S., and steam or water vapor.

The Colorado state patrol of the department of public safety shall offer the training course and qualification test.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 96, p. 1263

, § 171, effective August 7, 1996.)

This section shall apply only to motor vehicles intended, designed, and manufactured primarily for use in carrying passengers or cargo on roads, streets, and highways.

Subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to all areas of the state except the program area, which program area shall be subject to section 42-4-413.

Effective January 1, 1980, the offense of causing air pollution pursuant to this section, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars.

Subsequent offenses involving the same motor vehicle within one year of a conviction under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), upon conviction, shall be punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Any owner who receives a citation under the provisions of this section may continue to use the vehicle for which the offense is alleged, without restriction, until such owner's conviction.

Any fines collected pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (4) shall be divided in equal amounts and transmitted to the treasurer of the local jurisdiction in whose name the penalty was assessed and to the state treasurer for credit to the general fund.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2322, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a) amended, p. 955, § 12, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1263, § 171, effective August 7.

L. 2002:

IP(1)(a) amended, p. 1561, § 366, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(b) and (4)(c) amended, p. 1025, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1720, § 5, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 18-13-110 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-4-413. Visible emissions from diesel-powered motor vehicles unlawful - penalty.

Effective January 1, 1987, no owner or operator of a diesel-powered vehicle shall cause or knowingly permit the emission from the vehicle of any visible air contaminants that exceed the emission level as described in section 42-4-412 (2)(a) within the program area.

As used in this section:

"Air contaminant" means any fume, odor, smoke, particulate matter, vapor, gas, or combination thereof, except water vapor or steam condensate.

"Emission" means a discharge or release of one or more air contaminants into the atmosphere.

"Opacity" means the degree to which an air contaminant emission obscures the view of a trained observer, expressed in percentage of the obscuration or the percentage to which transmittance of light is reduced by an air contaminant emission.

"Trained observer" means a person who is certified by the department of public health and environment as trained in the determination of opacity.

A police officer or other peace officer who is a trained observer, or an environmental officer employed by a local government and certified by the department of public health and environment to determine opacity, at any time upon reasonable cause, may issue a summons personally to the operator of a motor vehicle emitting visible air contaminants in violation of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

Any owner or operator of a diesel-powered motor vehicle receiving the summons issued pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) or mailed pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) shall comply therewith and shall secure a certification of opacity compliance from a state emissions technical center that such vehicle conforms to the requirements of this section. Said certification shall be returned to the owner or operator for presentation in court as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2).

A fee of not more than six dollars and fifty cents shall be charged by emission technical centers for a certification of opacity compliance inspection and the certificate of no-smoke. Such fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the AIR account established in section 42-4-311 (3)(b).

Any owner who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.

If the owner submits to the court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the issuance of the summons proof that the owner has disposed of the vehicle for junk parts or immobilized the vehicle and if the owner also submits to the court within such time the registration and license plates for the vehicle, the owner shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars. If the owner wishes to relicense the vehicle in the future, the owner shall obtain the certification required in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

Any nonowner operator who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (d), shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.

If the operator submits to the court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the issuance of the summons proof that the operator was not the owner of the vehicle at the time the summons was issued and that the operator mailed, within five days after issuance thereof, a copy of the notice and summons by certified mail to the owner of the vehicle at the address on the registration, the operator shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars.

Upon a showing of good cause that compliance with this section cannot be made within thirty days after issuance of the notice and summons, the court of competent jurisdiction may extend the period of time for compliance as may appear justified.

The owner or operator, in lieu of appearance, may submit to the court of competent jurisdiction, within thirty days after the issuance of the notice and summons, the certification or proof of mailing specified in this subsection (2) together with the fine of twenty-five dollars.

Any fine collected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be transmitted to the treasurer of the local jurisdiction in which the violation occurred.

Source:

L. 94:

(1)(b)(IV) and (2)(a) amended, p. 2814, § 592, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2324, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1720, § 6, effective June 1.